test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_miizhashk_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
